Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Establishing Creditable Service by Veterans

47-1-60.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Creditable service” means service with a public retirement system or fund used in the same manner as actual service in the computation of all rights and benefits.

“Public retirement system or fund” means a public retirement system or fund created by this title.

“Qualified returning veteran” or “returning veteran” means a member of a public retirement system or fund whose employment which qualified him or her for such membership was interrupted by a period of qualified service and who returns to such employment in a manner sufficient to protect his or her reemployment rights as prescribed by Public Law 103-353, the federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act.

“Qualified service” means voluntary or involuntary service with one of the uniformed services, including active duty, active duty for training, initial active duty for training, inactive duty training, full-time National Guard duty, and any period during which a member is absent from employment for the purpose of an examination to determine his or her fitness to perform such duty.

“Uniformed services” means the United States Army, Army Reserve, Army National Guard, Navy, Navy Reserve, Marine Corps, Air Force, Air Force Reserve, Air National Guard, Coast Guard, the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, and any other category of persons designated by the President of the United States in time of war or emergency.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 367, § 1.

47-1-61.
Eligibility of veteran to establish creditable service; period of qualified service.

Any qualified returning veteran shall be eligible to establish creditable service with his or her retirement system or fund for not more than five years of qualified service by complying with the provisions of this article; provided, however, that such five-year period shall be extended by any period of mandatory service imposed by the uniformed service recognized by paragraph (4) of subsection (C) of Section 4312 of federal Public Law 103-353, the Uniformed Service Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994. Notwithstanding any provisions of the law to the contrary, contributions, benefits, and service credits with respect to qualified uniformed service will be provided under each retirement or pension system in accordance with Section 414(u) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 367, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 1/HB 460.

47-1-62.
Procedure for establishment of creditable service; computations; employer contributions; system or fund unable to provide creditable service.

Any qualified returning veteran desiring to establish creditable service for a period of qualified service shall so notify the board of trustees of the public retirement system or fund. The board of trustees shall calculate the amount of employee or member contribution which the returning veteran would have paid if he or she had been a member of the system or fund during the period of qualified service. If such contribution is based on the member’s salary, the returning veteran’s salary shall be deemed to be the rate the member would have received but for the period of qualified service or, if determination of such rate is not reasonably certain, the member’s average rate of compensation during the 12 month period immediately preceding the period of qualified service or such lesser time as the member was employed. The returning veteran shall repay the amount so calculated as his or her employee or member contribution, which payment must be completed not later than three times the length of qualified service or five years, whichever period is shorter, computed from the date the returning veteran resumes employment. The board of trustees of any public retirement system may provide by rule for computing the amount of creditable service on payment of less than the total amount of employee contributions.

At the time a qualified returning veteran applies for creditable service as provided in Code Section 47-1-61, the board of trustees of the public retirement system or fund shall compute the actuarial value of the creditable service to be granted.

The board of trustees of a retirement system or fund which requires employer contributions shall notify the employer of the returning veteran of the actuarial value, less the amount of employee contribution. The employer shall pay such amount to the retirement system over the same period of time allowed for the returning veteran to pay the employee contributions; provided, however, that an employer shall not be required to make any payment until the fiscal year following the year such notice is given.

If the actuary employed by a retirement system or fund created by this title which does not require an employer contribution certifies that the system or fund cannot provide the creditable service requested by one or more returning veterans and retain its actuarial soundness, no discretionary benefit increases shall be granted, and the board of trustees of such system or fund shall notify the Governor and chairpersons of the Senate and House Committees on Retirement, providing a full explanation of the amount of funds necessary to return the system or fund to actuarial soundness.

If a member of a public retirement system dies while performing qualified military service, as such term is defined in Section 414(U) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, the member’s beneficiary shall be entitled to all additional benefits to which the beneficiary would have been entitled if the member had resumed employment with the employer, reentered the plan, and died immediately thereafter. Unless otherwise required by Code Section 38-2-279, additional benefits to beneficiaries shall not include benefit accruals for the period of qualified military service.

If an employer pays differential wage payments, as such term is defined in Section 3401(h) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, to a member of a public retirement system while such member is in qualified military service, such payments shall be taken into account as compensation by the public retirement system or fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 367, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 325, § 1/HB 477; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 1/HB 969.

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 30, 2009, deleted “not later than six months from the date he or she resumes employment” following “fund” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a).

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, added paragraphs (b)(4) and (b)(5).

U.S. Code.

Section 414(U) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraph (b)(4), is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 414

.

Section 3401 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraph (b)(5), is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 3401

.